Florida, session 2026, HB519.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (5) through (9) of section 316.212,
Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (6) through
(10), respectively, paragraph (b) of present subsection (8) and
present subsection (9) are amended, and a new subsection (5) is
added to that section, to read:
316.212 Operation of golf carts on certain roadways.—The
operation of a golf cart upon the public roads or streets of
this state is prohibited except as provided herein:
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a
golf cart may be operated for the purpose of crossing a street
or highway within a crosswalk at a signalized intersection,
provided that:
1. The intersection is located wholly within the
boundaries of a single local governmental entity;
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb519-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 519 2026
2. The local governmental entity has designated, for the
operation of golf carts, the street or road located on both
sides of the street or highway spanned by the crosswalk; and
3. The local governmental entity has approved the
operation of golf carts at the crosswalk and has posted
appropriate signs at the signalized intersection to indicate
that operation of a golf cart is authorized at the crosswalk.
(9)(8) A local governmental entity may enact an ordinance
relating to:
(b) Golf cart operation on sidewalks adjacent to specific
segments of municipal streets, county roads, or state highways
within the jurisdictional territory of the local governmental
entity if:
1. The local governmental entity determines, after
considering the condition and current use of the sidewalks, the
character of the surrounding community, and the locations of
authorized golf cart crossings, that golf carts, bicycles, and
pedestrians may safely share the sidewalk;
2. The local governmental entity consults with the
Department of Transportation before adopting the ordinance;
3. The ordinance restricts golf carts to a maximum speed
of 15 miles per hour and permits such use on sidewalks adjacent
to state highways only if the sidewalks are at least 8 feet
wide;
4. The ordinance requires the golf carts to meet the
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb519-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 519 2026
equipment requirements in subsection (7) (6). However, the
ordinance may require additional equipment, including horns or
other warning devices required by s. 316.271; and
5. The local governmental entity posts appropriate signs
or otherwise informs residents that the ordinance exists and
applies to such sidewalks.
(10)(9) A violation of this section is a noncriminal
traffic infraction, punishable pursuant to chapter 318 as a
moving violation for infractions of subsections (1)-(6) (1)-(5)
or a local ordinance corresponding thereto and enacted pursuant
to subsection (9) (8), or punishable pursuant to chapter 318 as
a nonmoving violation for infractions of subsection (7) (6),
subsection (8) (7), or a local ordinance corresponding thereto
and enacted pursuant to subsection (9) (8).
Section 2. Subsection (1) of section 316.1995, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
316.1995 Driving upon sidewalk or bicycle path.—
(1) Except as provided in s. 316.008, s. 316.20655, s.
316.212(9) s. 316.212(8), or s. 316.2128, a person may not drive
any vehicle other than by human power upon a bicycle path,
sidewalk, or sidewalk area, except upon a permanent or duly
authorized temporary driveway.
Section 3. Subsection (1) of section 316.2125, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
316.2125 Operation of golf carts within a retirement
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb519-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 519 2026
community.—
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of s. 316.212, the
reasonable operation of a golf cart, equipped and operated as
provided in s. 316.212(6), (7), and (8) s. 316.212 (5), (6), and
(7), within any self-contained retirement community is
authorized permitted unless prohibited under subsection (2).
Section 4. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) and
paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 316.2126, Florida
Statutes, are amended to read:
316.2126 Authorized use of golf carts, low-speed vehicles,
and utility vehicles.—
(1) In addition to the powers granted by ss. 316.212 and
316.2125, municipalities are authorized to use golf carts and
utility vehicles, as defined in s. 320.01, upon any state,
county, or municipal roads located within the corporate limits
of such municipalities, subject to the following conditions:
(a) Golf carts and utility vehicles must comply with the
operational and safety requirements in ss. 316.212 and 316.2125,
and with any more restrictive ordinances enacted by the local
governmental entity pursuant to s. 316.212(9) s. 316.212(8), and
shall be operated only by municipal employees for municipal
purposes, including, but not limited to, police patrol, traffic
enforcement, and inspection of public facilities.
(b) In addition to the safety equipment required in s.
100 316.212(7) s. 316.212(6) and any more restrictive safety
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb519-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 519 2026
101 equipment required by the local governmental entity pursuant to
102 s. 316.212(9) s. 316.212(8), such golf carts and utility
103 vehicles must be equipped with sufficient lighting and turn
104 signal equipment.
105 (3)
106 (c) All vehicles specified in this subsection must be:
107 1. Marked in a conspicuous manner with the name of the
108 delivery service.
109 2. Equipped with, at a minimum, the equipment required
110 under s. 316.212(7) s. 316.212(6).
111 3. Equipped with head lamps and tail lamps, in addition to
112 the safety requirements in s. 316.212(7) s. 316.212(6), if
113 operated after sunset.
114 Section 5. Subsection (5) of section 316.2128, Florida
115 Statutes, is amended to read:
116 316.2128 Micromobility devices, motorized scooters, and
117 miniature motorcycles; requirements.—
118 (5) A person who engages in the business of, serves in the
119 capacity of, or acts as a commercial seller of miniature
120 motorcycles in this state must prominently display at his or her
121 place of business a notice that such vehicles are not legal to
122 operate on public roads, may not be registered as motor
123 vehicles, and may not be operated on sidewalks unless authorized
124 by an ordinance enacted pursuant to s. 316.008(7)(a) or s.
125 316.212(9) s. 316.212(8). The required notice must also appear
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb519-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 519 2026
126 in all forms of advertising offering miniature motorcycles for
127 sale. The notice and a copy of this section must also be
128 provided to a consumer before prior to the consumer's purchasing
129 or becoming obligated to purchase a miniature motorcycle.
130 Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb519-01-c1